cs: Konstrukce časovače: Analogový; Digitální; Zvětšování; Interval; Zpracování; Jiné
el: Σχεδιασμός χρονοδιακόπτη: Αναλογικό; Ψηφιακός; Μεγέθυνση; Διάστημα; Επεξεργασία; Άλλο
sk-SK: Dizajn časovača: Analógový; Digitálny; Zväčšovanie; Interval; Spracovanie; Iné
vi: Thiết kế hẹn giờ: Analog; Kỹ thuật số; Phóng to; Khoảng thời gian; Xử lý; Khác
de: Design des Timers: Analog; Digital; Vergrößerung; Intervall; Verarbeitung; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Design temporizator: Analogic; Digital; Mărire; Interval; Prelucrare; Altele
en: Timer design: Analog; Digital; Enlarging; Interval; Processing; Other
es: Diseño del temporizador: Analógico; Digital; Ampliador; Intervalo; Procesamiento; Otros
nb: Tidtakerdesign: Analog; Digital; Forstørrer; Intervall; Behandler; Annet
hr-HR: Dizajn tajmera: Analogni; Digitalni; Povećanje; Interval; Obrada; Ostalo
hu: Időzítő kialakítása: Analóg; Digitális; Nagyítás; Intervallum; Feldolgozás; Egyéb
fr: Conception de la minuterie: Analogique; Numérique; Agrandissement; Intervalle; Traitement; Autre
pl: Projekt timera: Analogowy; Cyfrowe; Powiększanie; Interwał; Przetwarzanie; Inne
pt-BR: Formato do temporizador: Analógico; Digital; Alargador; Intervalo; Processamento; Outro
sl-SI: Oblika časovnika: Analogna; Digitalno; Povečanje; Interval; Obdelava; Drugo
it: Design del temporizzatore: Analog; Digitale; Ampliamento; Intervallo; Elaborazione; Altro
ru: Конструкция таймера: Аналоговые; Цифровой; Увеличение; Интервал; Обработка; Другой
bg-BG: Дизайн на таймер: Аналогов; Цифров; Увеличаващ; Интервал; Обработка; Други
zh-TW: 定時器設計: 類比; 數位; 放大; 間隔; 處理; 其他
sv: Timerutförande: Analog; Digital; Förstorande; Intervall; Behandling; Övrigt
zh-CN: 定时器设计: 模拟; 数字化; 放大; 间隔; 处理; 其他
ja: タイマーの種類: アナログ; デジタル; 引き伸ばし; インターバル; 現像工程; その他
lt-LT: Laikmačio dizainas: Analoginis; Skaitmeninė; Didinamasis; Intervalas; Apdorojimas; Kita
nl: Ontwerp timer: Analoog; Digitaal; Vergroten; Interval; Verwerking; Andere
ko: 타이머 디자인: 아날로그; 디지털; 확대; 인터벌; 인화; 기타
th: การออกแบบตัวจับเวลา: อนาล็อก; ดิจิทัล; การขยายภาพ; ช่วงเวลา; การประมวลผล; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Design do temporizador: Analógico; Digital; Aumentar; Intervalo; Processamento; Outro
da: Timerdesign: Analog; Digital; Forstørrer; Interval; Behandling; Andet
tr: Zamanlayıcı tasarımı: Analog; Dijital; Agrandisör; Aralıklı; İşleme; Diğer
fi: Ajastimen muotoilu: Analoginen; Digitaalinen; Laajeneva; Intervalli; Käsittely; Muu